test/findequivalent-basic.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="house__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dog__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ball__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="house"><i>house</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dog"><i>dog</i><par n="dog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ball"><i>ball</i><par n="ball__n"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
